Illinois, session 104th, HB3652.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Fuel 5Gas Alarm Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:7    "Covered building" means any residential, commercial, or 8institutional structure that contains one or more gas-fueled 9appliances, including stoves, furnaces, water heaters, and 10dryers, and has an active natural gas or liquefied propane gas 11service connection.12    "Fuel gas alarm" means a device that is designed to detect 13natural gas or liquefied propane gas and provide an audible 14alarm, visual alarm, or a combination; that has been tested 15and listed by a nationally recognized independent testing 16laboratory; that conforms to either Underwriters Laboratories 17(UL) Standard 1484 or Standard 2075; and that is labeled with a 18visible ETL or UL certification indicating the device conforms 19to either UL Standard 1484 or UL Standard 2075.20    "Single and multifamily dwelling" means a building with 21one or more residential units. "Single and multifamily 22dwelling" includes an apartment, condominium, or townhome.   HB3652 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 09741 BDA 19807 b1    Section 10. Installation requirements. 2    (a) All covered buildings must have at least one fuel gas 3alarm in each room containing a gas appliance, in accordance 4with National Fire Protection Association (NFPA) 715, Standard 5for the Installation of Fuel Gases Alarm and Warning 6Equipment, and the fuel gas alarm manufacturer's instructions.7    (b) All new covered buildings and covered buildings that 8have undergone major renovations must include hardwired or 9battery-powered fuel gas alarms for enhanced safety. Single 10and multifamily dwellings must have individual unit alarms 11installed in every room containing a gas appliance in 12accordance with National Fire Protection Association (NFPA) 13715, Standard for the Installation of Fuel Gases Alarm and 14Warning Equipment.15    (c) Battery-powered fuel gas alarms are allowed in 16existing buildings and where hardwiring is otherwise 17infeasible. Battery-powered and plug-in fuel gas alarms do not 18need to be interconnected or monitored, unless an applicable 19building code dictates otherwise. Battery-powered alarms must 20have a minimum lifespan of 6 years and include an end-of-life 21warning mechanism. 22    Section 15. Compliance and implementation. 23    (a) All covered buildings must comply with the 24requirements of this Act on or before January 1, 2028.25    (b) Compliance with the requirements of this Act shall be   HB3652 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 09741 BDA 19807 b1verified during certificate of occupancy issuance for new 2buildings, rental license renewals, and fire safety 3inspections for existing buildings.4    (c) A person who is not an electrician may install a 5battery-powered or plug-in fuel gas alarm, but a licensed 6electrician must install a hardwired fuel gas alarm system. 7    Section 20. Transfer of property requirements. A person 8who, after January 1, 2027, acquires by sale or exchange a 9covered building must install fuel gas alarms within 30 days 10of acquisition or occupancy, whichever is later, if compliant 11fuel gas alarms are not already present. A transfer of real 12property that includes a covered building shall include a 13certification that fuel gas alarms are or will be installed, 14with the certification signed and dated by the buyer. Fuel gas 15alarms shall be installed in accordance with the 16manufacturer's installation instructions and National Fire 17Protection Association (NFPA) 715, Standard for the 18Installation of Fuel Gases Alarm and Warning Equipment. A 19certification of compliance with this Act must be provided at 20the time of sale or lease of any covered building or any part 21of any covered building. 22    Section 25. Funding for low-income households. A State 23Fuel Gas Safety Assistance Fund is established as a special 24fund in the State treasury. The Fund may accept moneys from any   HB3652 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 09741 BDA 19807 b1lawful source. Any interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall 2be deposited into the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used by 3the Office of the State Fire Marshal to provide free or 4subsidized fuel gas alarms to low-income households. The State 5Fire Marshall shall establish, by rule, a program to provide 6free or subsidized gas alarms to low-income households. 7    Section 30. Penalties and enforcement. A violation of this 8Act or any rule adopted under this Act is a petty offense. The 9Office of the State Fire Marshal, the Attorney General, or the 10State's Attorney of the county where the violation occurred 11may enforce this Act. 12    Section 35. Local government grants. Subject to 13appropriation, the Office of the State Fire Marshal may award 14grants to units of local governments to implement enhanced 15enforcement and education programs for the purposes of this 16Act. The State Fire Marshal shall adopt rules providing for 17processes and criteria for the awarding of grants to units of 18local government under this Section. 19    Section 40. Gas Detector Alliance. The Gas Detector 20Alliance is created within the Office of the State Fire 21Marshal. The Gas Detector Alliance shall consist of members 22appointed by the State Fire Marshal. The membership of the Gas 23Detector Alliance shall be composed of one representative of   HB3652 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 09741 BDA 19807 b1the National Fire Protection Association, the Illinois 2Professional Firefighters Association, the Illinois Fire 3Safety Alliance, the Illinois Rural Fire Association, the 4Illinois Municipal League, the Illinois Fire Chiefs 5Association, the Illinois Fire Inspectors Association, and the 6Illinois Association of Fire Protection Districts and 3 7representatives of gas utilities operating in this State. The 8Gas Detector Alliance shall make recommendations to the Office 9of the State Fire Marshal concerning the effectiveness of this 10Act and any changes in legislation or rules that the Gas 11Detector Alliance believes are necessary to effectuate the 12purpose of this Act. 13    Section 45. Home rule. A home rule unit may not regulate 14fuel gas alarm installation in a manner less restrictive than 15the regulation of fuel gas alarm installation under this Act. 16This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 17of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent 18exercise by home rule units of powers and functions exercised 19by the State. 20    Section 50. Rulemaking. The Office of the State Fire 21Marshal shall adopt rules implementing this Act. 22    Section 90. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 23Section 5.1030 as follows:   HB3652 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 09741 BDA 19807 b1    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)2    Sec. 5.1030. The State Fuel Gas Safety Assistance Fund. 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 41, 2026.